Utah statutes.
53B-8a-104.   Office facilities, clerical, and administrative support for
the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust.
(1)  The board shall provide to the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust, by
agreement, administrative and clerical support and office facilities and
space.
(2)  Reasonable charges or fees may be levied against the Utah Educational
Savings Plan Trust pursuant to the agreement for the services provided by the
board.
